dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- मोटोघाटो; मोट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोट/ोघाटो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाघाटा</l>
          <r>ोघाटो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थप; थप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थप__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सहि; सह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सह/ि__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ि<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पोषिलो; पोषिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पोषिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फोस्रो; फोस्र; 2 -->
    <pardef n="फोस्र/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्ताउलो; उत्ताउल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="उत्ताउल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उदाङ्गो; उदाङ्गो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उदाङ्गो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मलिलो; मलिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मलिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तेस्रो; तेस्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तेस्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विदेशी; विदेशी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विदेशी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आवश्यक; आवश्यक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आवश्यक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुरानो; पुरान; 2 -->
    <pardef n="पुरान/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भौतिक; भौतिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भौतिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महङ्गो; महङ्गो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महङ्गो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रस्तुत; प्रस्तुत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रस्तुत__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कम; कम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कम__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चर्को; चर्क; 2 -->
    <pardef n="चर्क/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थुप्रो; थुप्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थुप्र/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फुस्रो; फुस्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फुस्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाँसउठ्दो; हाँसउठ्दो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हाँसउठ्दो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आधा; आध; 2 -->
    <pardef n="आध/ा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फ्याक-खो; फ्याक-खो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फ्याक-खो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अप्ठेरो; अप्ठेरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अप्ठेरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खैरो; खैरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खैरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विरानो; विरानो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विरानो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पापनाशिनी; पापनाशिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पापनाशिनी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काइलो; काइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काइ/लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ँला</l>
          <r>लो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तातो; तात; 2 -->
    <pardef n="तात/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जाँतो; जाँतो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जाँतो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फटाहा; फटाहा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फटाहा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हसिलो; ह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ह/सिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ँसिला</l>
          <r>सिलो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कानो; कानो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कानो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकोहोरो; एकोहोर; 2 -->
    <pardef n="एकोहोर/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठाडो; ठाड; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ठाड/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सब; सब; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सब__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उचित; उचित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उचित__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खडा; खडा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खडा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एक्लो; एक्ल; 3 -->
    <pardef n="एक्ल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="मोटोघाटो"><i>मोट</i><par n="मोट/ोघाटो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थप"><i>थप</i><par n="थप__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सहि"><i>सह</i><par n="सह/ि__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पोषिलो"><i>पोषिलो</i><par n="पोषिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फोस्रो"><i>फोस्र</i><par n="फोस्र/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्ताउलो"><i>उत्ताउल</i><par n="उत्ताउल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उदाङ्गो"><i>उदाङ्गो</i><par n="उदाङ्गो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मलिलो"><i>मलिलो</i><par n="मलिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तेस्रो"><i>तेस्रो</i><par n="तेस्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विदेशी"><i>विदेशी</i><par n="विदेशी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आवश्यक"><i>आवश्यक</i><par n="आवश्यक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुरानो"><i>पुरान</i><par n="पुरान/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भौतिक"><i>भौतिक</i><par n="भौतिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="महङ्गो"><i>महङ्गो</i><par n="महङ्गो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रस्तुत"><i>प्रस्तुत</i><par n="प्रस्तुत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कम"><i>कम</i><par n="कम__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चर्को"><i>चर्क</i><par n="चर्क/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थुप्रो"><i>थुप्र</i><par n="थुप्र/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फुस्रो"><i>फुस्रो</i><par n="फुस्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हाँसउठ्दो"><i>हाँसउठ्दो</i><par n="हाँसउठ्दो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आधा"><i>आध</i><par n="आध/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फ्याक-खो"><i>फ्याक-खो</i><par n="फ्याक-खो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्ठेरो"><i>अप्ठेरो</i><par n="अप्ठेरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरो"><i>खैरो</i><par n="खैरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विरानो"><i>विरानो</i><par n="विरानो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पापनाशिनी"><i>पापनाशिनी</i><par n="पापनाशिनी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="काइलो"><i>काइ</i><par n="काइ/लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तातो"><i>तात</i><par n="तात/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जाँतो"><i>जाँतो</i><par n="जाँतो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फटाहा"><i>फटाहा</i><par n="फटाहा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हसिलो"><i>ह</i><par n="ह/सिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कानो"><i>कानो</i><par n="कानो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एकोहोरो"><i>एकोहोर</i><par n="एकोहोर/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठाडो"><i>ठाड</i><par n="ठाड/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सब"><i>सब</i><par n="सब__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उचित"><i>उचित</i><par n="उचित__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खडा"><i>खडा</i><par n="खडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एक्लो"><i>एक्ल</i><par n="एक्ल/ो__adj"/></e>
